New York, session 2025-2026, A7041.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 1266-b of the 2 public authorities law, as amended by chapter 396 of the laws of 2005, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 a. The authority in consultation with the Long Island Rail Road is 5 hereby authorized and directed to implement a comprehensive medical 6 emergency services program, including an emergency response protocol, 7 not later than September first, two thousand five, for the benefit of 8 persons utilizing transportation and other related services of the Long 9 Island Rail Road. Such program shall include but not be limited to 10 provision for the following: The training of designated employees in 11 first aid, emergency techniques and procedures, handling and positioning 12 of stricken commuters, knowledge of procedures and equipment used for 13 respiratory and cardiac emergencies [and], an emergency response proto- 14 col for all employees, and provide and maintain on each train and at 15 each station an automated external defibrillator. 16 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 1266-f of the public authorities law, as 17 added by chapter 581 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 18 1. The authority is hereby authorized and directed to implement a 19 medical emergency services program not later than April first, nineteen 20 hundred eighty-six, for the benefit of persons utilizing transportation 21 and other related services of the Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company. 22 Such program shall include but not be limited to provision for the 23 following: The training of conductors, trainmen and other designated EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10309-01-5 A. 7041 2 1 employees in first aid, emergency techniques and procedures, handling 2 and positioning of stricken commuters, [and] knowledge of procedures and 3 equipment used for respiratory and cardiac emergencies, and provide and 4 maintain on each train and at each station an automated external defi- 5 brillator. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 7 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 8 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 9 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 10 effective date.